Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.135

Establishment of investigation unit—Use of criminal history information.

(1) There is established an investigation unit within the department for the purpose of detection, investigation, and prosecution of any act prohibited or declared to be unlawful in the programs administered by the department. The director will employ qualified supervisory, legal, and investigative personnel for the program. Program staff must be qualified by training and experience.

(2) The director and the investigation unit are authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated with an investigation conducted by the investigation unit established under this section. Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes other than that authorized in this section is prohibited.

[ 2008 c 74 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—2008 c 74: See note following RCW 51.04.024.